District of Columbia statutes.
16-4604.02

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Abduction” means the wrongful removal or wrongful retention of a child.

(2)

“Child” means an unemancipated individual who is less than 18 years of age.

(3)

“Child-custody proceeding” means a proceeding in which legal custody, physical custody, or visitation with respect to a child is at issue. The term includes a proceeding for divorce, dissolution of marriage, separation, neglect, abuse, dependency, guardianship, paternity, termination of parental rights, or protection from domestic violence.

(4)

“Petition” includes a motion or its equivalent.

(5)

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(6)

“Travel document” means records relating to a travel itinerary, including travel tickets, passes, reservations for transportation, or accommodations. The term “travel document” does not include a passport or visa.

(7)

“Wrongful removal” means the taking of a child that breaches rights of custody or visitation given or recognized under the law of this state.

(8)

“Wrongful retention” means the keeping or concealing of a child that breaches rights of custody or visitation given or recognized under the law of this state.

Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-378, § 2(d), 56 DCR 1572

Former § 16-4604.02 has been recodified as § 16-4605.03 by D.C. Law 17-378, § 2(e).

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 2 of the Uniform Child Abduction Prevention Act.